District of Columbia statutes.
49-206

Transfer of property on promotion, retirement, or dismissal.

Upon the promotion, tender of resignation, retirement, or dismissal of any officer who is responsible or accountable for public property, the Commanding General of the militia shall designate an officer to accept and receipt for such property, and direct the officer responsible or accountable therefor to make prompt transfer of all property remaining on hand; and it shall be the duty of the officer responsible or accountable to proceed at once to complete such transfer and close his accounts without delay.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 34
1981 Ed., § 39-206.
1973 Ed., § 39-506.